apertium-fra.fra.metadix
<pardef n="appel/er__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>lerions</l>   <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lerais</l>    <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>leriez</l>    <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lerais</l>    <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>leraient</l>  <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lerait</l>    <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lerons</l>    <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lerai</l>     <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lerez</l>     <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>leras</l>     <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>leront</l>    <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lera</l>      <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ant</l>       <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>âmes</l>      <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ai</l>        <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>âtes</l>      <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>as</l>        <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>èrent</l>     <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ons</l>       <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ons</l>       <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__enc1"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ez</l>        <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ez</l>        <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__enc1"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>le</l>        <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>le</l>        <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__enc1"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ions</l>      <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ais</l>       <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iez</l>       <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ais</l>       <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aient</l>     <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ait</l>       <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>assions</l>   <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>asse</l>      <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>assiez</l>    <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>asses</l>     <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>assent</l>    <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ât</l>        <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ées</l>       <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ée</l>        <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>és</l>        <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>é</l>         <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ons</l>       <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>le</l>        <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ez</l>        <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>les</l>       <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lent</l>      <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>le</l>        <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ions</l>      <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>le</l>        <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iez</l>       <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>les</l>       <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lent</l>      <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>le</l>        <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="appeler"><i>appel</i><par n="appel/er__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="appeler un chat un chat"><i>appel</i><par n="appel/er__vblex"/><p><l><b/>un<b/>chat<b/>un<b/>chat</l><r><g><b/>un<b/>chat<b/>un<b/>chat</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="atteler"><i>attel</i><par n="appel/er__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="canneler"><i>cannel</i><par n="appel/er__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="jumeler"><i>jumel</i><par n="appel/er__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="niveler"><i>nivel</i><par n="appel/er__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="rappeler"><i>rappel</i><par n="appel/er__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="renouveler"><i>renouvel</i><par n="appel/er__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="étiqueter"><i>étiquet</i><par n="appel/er__vblex"/></e>
